District of Columbia statutes.
1-1319

Boundaries of lots to be marked.

The Surveyor shall, or a registered land surveyor may, on the request of the proprietor or proprietors of any square, lot, or piece of ground within the District of Columbia set out and mark the proper lines, and furnish to him, her, or them a certificate describing the dimensions and boundaries of the same, according to the plan.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1427, ch. 854, § 1598
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 5005(b), 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 1-919.
1973 Ed., § 1-619.